Utah statutes.
62A-7-105.5.   Information supplied to division.

(1)  Juvenile court probation sections shall render full and complete cooperation to the division in supplying the division with all pertinent information relating to youth offenders who have been committed to the division. 

(2)  Information under Subsection (1) may include, but is not limited to, prior criminal history, social history, psychological evaluations, and identifying information specified by the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 13, 2005 General Session

